Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 15. Domestic Relations

Executive Order No. 15-1
(No. 10-93) [Council on Family Violence.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 11-99 (codified as Executive Order No. 15-4), dated December 8, 1999.

Executive Order No. 15-2
(No. 10-96) [Creation of Vermont Council on Family Violence.

Expired by its own terms, effective July 1998.

Executive Order No. 15-3
(No. 12-98) [Vermont Council on Family Violence.

Expired by its own terms, effective July 2000.

Executive Order No. 15-4
(No. 11-99) [Rescission of Executive Order No. 10-93.

WHEREAS, the Council on Family Violence, created by Executive Order No. 10-93, has been superseded by a similar body.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, M.D., by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, to hereby revoke and rescind Executive Order No. 10-93, dated August 11, 1993, and relating to the Council on Family Violence.

Dated December 8, 1999.

Executive Order No. 15-5
(No. 06-00) [Vermont Council on Family Violence.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 11-01 (codified as Executive Order No. 15-7), dated December 3, 2001.

Executive Order No. 15-6
(No. 07-00) [Domestic Violence and the Workplace.

Expired by its own terms, effective October 2003.

Executive Order No. 15-7
(No. 11-01) [Creation of the Vermont Council on Domestic Violence.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 04-06 (codified as Executive Order No. 15-8), dated June 29, 2006.

Executive Order No. 15-8
(No. 04-06) [Creation of the Vermont Council on Domestic Violence.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-50 (codified as Executive Order 10-09), dated December 23, 2009.

Executive Order No. 15-9
(No. 02-11) [Prevention of Domestic and Sexual Violence Task Force.

Rescinded and superseded by Executive Order No. 16-11 (codified as Executive Order No. 15-10), dated November 17, 2011.

Executive Order No. 15-10
(No. 16-11) [Governor’s Prevention of Domestic and Sexual Violence Task Force.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.